Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202532-123
Valid photographic identification, defined.

Valid photographic identification means:

(1) A document issued by the United States, the State of Nebraska, an agency or a political subdivision of the State of Nebraska, or a postsecondary institution within the State of Nebraska that:

(a) Shows the name of the individual to whom the document was issued; and

(b) Shows a photograph or digital image of the individual to whom the document was issued;

(2) A document issued by the United States Department of Defense, the United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its predecessor, the Veterans Administration, a branch of the uniformed services as defined in section 85-2902, or a Native American Indian tribe or band recognized by the United States Government that:

(a) Shows the name of the individual to whom the document was issued; and

(b) Shows a photograph or digital image of the individual to whom the document was issued; or

(3) A hospital, an assisted-living facility, a nursing home, a hospice, a provider agency for home or community-based developmental disability services, or any other intermediate care facility record that:

(a) Shows the name of the individual who is the subject of the record; and

(b) Shows a photograph or digital image of the individual who is the subject of the record.

Laws 2023, LB514, § 3;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 10;

Laws 2025, LB521, § 21.